Ohio, session 136, HB914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3109.50 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3109.50. As used in sections 3109.501 to 3109.507 of the Revised Code: (A) "Parental rights" means parental rights and responsibilities, parenting time, or any other similar right established by the laws of this state with respect to a child. "Parental rights" does not include the parental duty of support for a child. (B) "Rape" means a violation of section 2907.02 of the Revised Code or similar law of another state or a foreign jurisdiction. (C) "Sexual battery" means a violation of section 2907.03 of the Revised Code if the sexual activity involved is sexual conduct, or similar law of another state or a foreign jurisdiction. Section 2. That existing section 3109.50 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.